North Carolina, session 2025, SB579.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. NORTH CAROLINA HIGH SCHOOL REDESIGN COMMISSION
SECTION 1.(a) Commission Established. – There is established the North Carolina
High School Redesign Commission (Commission). The Commission shall be located
administratively in the Department of Public Instruction but shall exercise all of its prescribed
powers independently of the Department. The purpose of the Commission is to explore and
recommend changes to policies and systems governing high school and higher education that
will better prepare North Carolina students for success as they transition to higher education or
the workforce.
SECTION 1.(b) Commission Membership. – The Commission shall consist of 15
members as follows:
(1) Two members appointed by the General Assembly upon recommendation of
the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(2) Two members appointed by the General Assembly upon recommendation of
the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
(3) One member appointed by the Governor.
(4) The State Superintendent of Public Instruction or his or her designee.
(5) The President of The University of North Carolina or his or her designee.
(6) The President of North Carolina Independent Colleges and Universities or his
or her designee.
(7) The President of the North Carolina Community College System or his or her
designee.
(8) The chief executive officers of each of the following organizations, or their
designees: MyFutureNC, the North Carolina Chamber of Commerce, BEST
NC, and SparkNC.
(9) One chief administrative officer or president of a community college
participating in a program, project, or initiative developed pursuant to this act
and one superintendent of a local school administrative unit participating in a
program, project, or initiative developed pursuant to this act or their respective
designees. These commissioners shall be appointed by the chair of the
Commission elected pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.
*S579-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(c) The Commission shall elect a chair from the members appointed by
the General Assembly. Each commissioner shall have one vote for the chair, except those
commissioners to be appointed by the chair pursuant to subdivision (9) of subsection (b) of this
section who shall not yet be appointed. The Commission shall meet at least four times annually.
The Commission shall meet on the call of the chair or as additionally provided by the
Commission. A quorum is six members of the Commission. Members may not vote by proxy.
SECTION 1.(d) All members shall be appointed to terms for the entire duration of
the Commission. Any vacancy in a term shall be filled by the appointing authority for the
remainder of the unexpired term.
SECTION 1.(e) Commission Duties. – The Commission shall examine promising
practices in North Carolina and nationally to inform the Commission's recommendations. At a
minimum, the Commission shall consider the following:
(1) Flexible requirements for high school diplomas that are relevant to the
knowledge, skills, and abilities students will need for success in the future
workforce.
(2) Access to apprenticeships, internships, clinical experiences, and other
high-quality, work-based learning experiences while in high school.
(3) Opportunities for students to earn industry recognized credentials while in
high school.
(4) Partnerships between public school units and North Carolina Community
Colleges, The University of North Carolina, and North Carolina Independent
Colleges and Universities for the purposes of facilitating subdivisions (1)
through (3) of this subsection.
(5) Personalized pathways for students to satisfy core graduation requirements.
(6) Modular credit bearing alternatives to semester or yearlong courses.
(7) Competency-based alternatives to time bound courses.
(8) Strategies for extending learning beyond school walls at scale via community
connected experiences, including incorporating incentives for local businesses
to partner with schools.
(9) Uses of artificial intelligence to expand student opportunities to engage in
career exploration and work-based learning experiences.
(10) Alternative funding models to enable the development of a statewide learning
ecosystem that encourages subdivisions (1) through (9) of this subsection.
(11) Career exploration opportunities for students in middle school and the first
two years of high school that prepare students to engage successfully in a
redesigned high school experience.
(12) Evaluation of the programs, projects, and initiatives established by this act,
and any other competency-based education (CBE) programs or high school
redesign efforts taking place in the State. The Commission shall partner with
the Office of Learning Research at the North Carolina Collaboratory to
conduct these evaluations.
SECTION 1.(f) Meetings and Organization. – The chair shall designate one or more
of the organizations identified in subdivision (8) of Section 1(b) of this act to plan and manage
Commission meetings and draft reports. Designated organizations shall provide administrative
staff for meetings. Funds appropriated to the Department of Public Instruction to be used to
contract with one or more organizations to plan and manage Commission meetings pursuant to
this act shall be divided equally among the organizations designated by the chair unless otherwise
agreed by the chair and all designated organizations.
SECTION 1.(g) Report. – The Commission shall submit a report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee by April 30, 2026, and annually thereafter. The
reports shall include all recommendations approved by a majority of Commission members and
Page 2 Senate Bill 579-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a summary of any evaluations of the efficacy of any CBE programs and high school redesign
efforts implemented during the current school year.
SECTION 1.(h) The Commission shall terminate on June 30, 2030, or upon filing
of its final annual report, whichever occurs first.

PART II. COMPETENCY-BASED AND HIGH SCHOOL REDESIGN PROGRAMS

COMPETENCY-BASED HIGH SCHOOL AND HEALTHCARE AND HIGH-TECH
PATHWAYS PROGRAM
SECTION 2.(a) Program Established; Purpose. – There is established the
Competency-Based High School and Healthcare and High-Tech Pathways Program (Program).
The purpose of the Program is to create pathways that will utilize competency-based education
(CBE). Pathways will result in obtaining either an associate degree or an industry recognized
credential/certification/licensure based on the student's goal of employment or enrollment.
Students will decide their college or career track at the end of their junior year with an initial
emphasis on healthcare preparation.
SECTION 2.(b) Participants. – Mooresville Graded School District (MGSD) shall
partner with Mitchell Community College (MCC) to implement the Program.
SECTION 2.(c) Program Time Line. – MGSD, in collaboration with MCC, shall
contract with an organization with demonstrated expertise in designing and implementing
learner-centered, modular, and competency-based high school programs that align with emerging
and high-tech career pathways. The organization shall have experience in co-designing stackable
credentials with local education agencies and higher education partners and a documented track
record of developing digital infrastructure that supports student-paced progression,
interdisciplinary learning, and real-world skill acquisition. This expert partner shall assist in
developing a framework for the Program, including course design, sequencing, credentialing
structure, and other elements necessary for personalized student progression during the
2025-2026 school year. Students will have the opportunity to participate in a pathway provided
by the Program by the 2027-2028 school year at the latest.
SECTION 2.(d) Program Flexibilities. – Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, the following flexibilities shall be available to Program participants:
(1) MGSD may offer Credit by Demonstrated Mastery assessments and CTE
Proof of Learning assessments outside of existing State testing windows.
(2) MCC may enroll MGSD students in community college courses prior to their
eleventh grade year without the student meeting the requirements for ninth
and tenth grade students pursuant to subdivision (4) of G.S. 115D-20.
(3) Students participating in the Program shall have access to all community
college courses at MCC, regardless of pathway selection.
(4) MGSD may replace any high school graduation credit requirement, except
those outlined in this subdivision, with either community college courses
offered by MCC or locally developed CBE courses that are consistent with
the student's pathway. MGSD shall not replace any graduation credit
requirements in the following subject areas:
a. English.
b. Mathematics.
c. Science.
d. Social Studies.
(5) All schools in MGSD shall be deemed to have been continuously operating
under a modified calendar since the 2003-2004 school year for purposes of
G.S. 115C-84.2(d). MGSD may align their school calendar with the MCC
calendar.
Senate Bill 579-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-295, beginning July 1, 2026, so long as MGSD is
participating in the Program, up to fifty percent (50%) of the teachers in each
school in MGSD may be employed as teachers despite not holding teacher
licenses if they meet the requirements set out in this subdivision. All teachers
who are teaching in the core subject areas of mathematics, science, social
studies, and language arts shall be college graduates. All teachers hired by
MGSD who are not licensed as a teacher by the State shall complete preservice
training, which may be offered through an educator preparation program or
by a local school administrative unit, in all of the following areas prior to
beginning instruction:
a. The identification and education of children with disabilities.
b. Positive management of student behavior.
c. Effective communication for defusing and de-escalating disruptive or
dangerous behavior.
d. Safe and appropriate use of seclusion and restraint.
(7) Beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the Department of Public
Instruction shall calculate the amount of State funds to be allocated to MGSD
on the same basis as other local school administrative units and shall distribute
those funds to MGSD. The Department shall use statewide average salary
figures for the purpose of calculating the dollar equivalent of guaranteed
positions as necessary. The funds allocated to MGSD shall be subject to any
restrictions as to use imposed by federal law, the conditions of federal or State
grants, or as provided through any rules that the State Board adopts to ensure
compliance with federal regulations. Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-105.25, use
of these funds shall otherwise be unrestricted except as provided in this act.
(8) The deposit of money in the State treasury to the credit of MGSD shall be
made as necessary for the operation of MGSD. The State Board may withhold
money to be distributed to MGSD if any report required to be filed with State
school authorities is more than 30 days overdue. Money in the State Public
School Fund and State bond moneys shall be released only on warrants drawn
on the State Treasurer, signed by a local official as required by the State Board.
(9) Upon notification by the Board of Trustees of the Teachers' and State
Employees' Retirement System to the State Treasurer and the Office of State
Budget and Management as to any default of MGSD, the State Board shall
withhold from any State appropriation due to MGSD an amount equal to the
sum of all delinquent contributions and payments due to the Retirement
Systems Division and shall transmit that amount to the Retirement Systems
Division.
SECTION 2.(e) Selection of Third-Party Vendor. – MGSD shall select a third-party
vendor (Vendor) that is an educational support provider with a nationally recognized,
research-based instructional and leadership framework, including a High Reliability School
model, a taxonomy of educational objectives aligned to classroom strategies, and a system for
implementing personalized competency-based education. The provider shall have published
extensively in peer-reviewed and practitioner literature, have an established track record of
working directly with K-12 schools and districts across multiple states, and offer professional
development services, implementation support, and instructional resources developed and led by
a founding education researcher with over four decades of influence in curriculum, instruction,
and assessment.
SECTION 2.(f) MGSD Partnership with Vendor. – MGSD shall partner with the
Vendor selected pursuant to subsection (e) of this section to develop standards-aligned
proficiency scales for all content areas in grades nine through 12 to ensure educators in the
Page 4 Senate Bill 579-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
participating schools have the tools necessary to successfully transition to CBE approaches. The
Vendor shall provide professional development and coaching to the schools in MGSD to ensure
educators can engage in learning about CBE approaches, including implementation of the
proficiency scales developed by MGSD.
SECTION 2.(g) Funding. – It is the intention of the General Assembly to appropriate
from the General Fund to the Department of Public Instruction the sum of up to two million
dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. These
funds would not revert but remain available until the end of the 2026-2027 fiscal year. These
funds shall be allocated to MGSD for the following purposes:
(1) To contract with experts in CBE and designing stackable credentials pursuant
to subsection (c) of this section.
(2) To hire one additional staff member at MGSD to oversee implementation of
the Program.
(3) To partner with a Vendor pursuant to subsection (f) of this section.

LIGHTHOUSE MATH PROJECT
SECTION 3.(a) Project Established; Purpose. – There is established the Lighthouse
Math Project (Project). The purpose of the Project is to increase the percentage of high school
students who are (i) eligible to complete college level mathematics upon graduation from high
school and (ii) able to complete college level math either through dual enrollment while in high
school or within the first year of college enrollment.
SECTION 3.(b) Project Participants. – Wake Technical Community College (Wake
Tech) shall partner with Wake County Public School System (WCPSS) for high school students
at East Wake High School and Knightdale High School to be eligible to participate in the Project
at the Wake Tech East campus of Wake Tech. Wake Tech and WCPSS shall partner with
SparkNC to align the Project participants' ongoing efforts at the Wake Tech East campus with
the design and implementation of the Project.
SECTION 3.(c) Project Commitments. – WCPSS, in collaboration with Wake Tech,
shall contract with Khan Academy, Inc. (Khan), for use of the artificial intelligence student
tutoring program, Khanmigo. Students enrolling at participating high schools shall have access
to Khanmigo from the time of enrollment in the high school and continuing through their
attendance at Wake Tech if the student chooses to enroll at Wake Tech East. Wake Tech shall
collaborate with Khan to do the following:
(1) Develop and deliver at least one Khanmigo-centered gateway college math
course to be offered to high school students at participating high schools to be
completed as a college level math course. This course shall also be available
to students who graduate from participating high schools and enroll in the
courses at Wake Tech East.
(2) Develop a Khanmigo-centered developmental math course sequence that will
be provided by Wake Tech faculty to students from participating high schools
in one of the following formats:
a. As part of a Career and College Promise Career Ready Pathway.
b. As supplement to a Career and College Promise Pathway.
c. As a summer bridge program eligible to students prior to or subsequent
to their junior and senior years of high school.
d. As a community college course during the first semester of enrollment
at Wake Tech.
SECTION 3.(d) Modular Math Course – As part of the Project, Khan, in consultation
with Wake Tech and WCPSS, shall work to develop a self-paced, competency-based modular
math course with appropriate student diagnostics and student assessments based on the college
readiness math competencies provided as part of the Project. It is the intent that students
Senate Bill 579-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
successfully demonstrating college readiness math competencies will be eligible to enroll in
college level math courses.
SECTION 3.(e) Funding; DPI. – It is the intention of the General Assembly to
appropriate from the General Fund to the Department of Public Instruction the sum of up to five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to
contract with Khan for licenses for the Khanmigo application and to create the course developed
pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of this section. It is the intention of the General
Assembly that funds appropriated for the purposes laid out in this section shall not revert but
shall remain available to accomplish the purposes of this section until the end of the 2026-2027
fiscal year.
SECTION 3.(f) Funding; NCCCS. – It is the intention of the General Assembly to
appropriate from the General Fund to the Community Colleges System Office the sum of up to
one million dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used
to establish time-limited positions at Wake Tech. Two positions shall be assigned to work in each
participating high school to assist in the implementation of the courses offered by the Project. It
is the intention of the General Assembly that funds appropriated for the purposes laid out in this
section shall not revert but shall remain available to accomplish the purposes of this section until
the end of the 2028-2029 fiscal year.

COMMUNITY COLLEGE SEAMLESS SKILLS INITIATIVE
SECTION 4.(a) Initiative Established; Purpose. – There is established the
Community College Seamless Skills Initiative (Initiative). The purpose of the Initiative is to
create a competency-based education (CBE) model that seamlessly connects high school and
community college. By aligning learning experiences from high school with college-level
competencies, the Initiative enables students to explore career pathways, earn dual credit, and
fulfill computer science requirements while gaining credentials of value in high-demand
technology employment sectors through college credit.
SECTION 4.(b) Initiative Participants. – Fayetteville Technical Community College
(FTCC) and Wilkes Community College (WCC) shall partner to implement the duties of the
Initiative.
SECTION 4.(c) Project Commitments. – The Project shall commit to accomplishing
each of the following:
(1) Establish high-tech pathways that will integrate high school and community
college curricula for hands-on, project-based learning.
(2) Develop competency-based pathways that will create cross-curricular maps
for dual credit, fostering seamless transitions between secondary and
postsecondary education.
(3) Scale and replicate to be able to build a scalable framework for rapid
implementation across North Carolina.
(4) Empower student ownership by enabling students to set long-term learning
goals and to manage and own their credentials with a digital wallet.
(5) Facilitate student work experiences to accelerate learning and transition
students into work through "learn & earn" work-based learning in partnership
with public agencies and private employers.
(6) Address workforce needs by developing and sustaining a comprehensive
talent pipeline of skilled workers for high-demand technology fields in
occupations that depend upon IT and OT for operational success.
(7) Develop statewide resources, including a guidebook to facilitate model
replication and a new talent development model to accelerate learning using
CBE.
Page 6 Senate Bill 579-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4.(d) Digital Wallet. – The participants in the Initiative shall contract
with a third-party entity to create a secure, interoperable digital wallet platform capable of
issuing, storing, verifying, and sharing learner credentials, including microcredentials,
certifications, transcripts, and verified skill records. The platform shall allow for credential
portability across educational institutions and employers, support open standards for
interoperability, and ensure privacy and security in compliance with applicable laws. The system
shall enable learners to manage a comprehensive, lifelong record of achievement that is
accessible, verifiable, and shareable with third parties through digital means. All credential and
learner data shall be owned and controlled by the student and shall not be stored in centralized
cloud infrastructure.
SECTION 4.(e) Support. – The Community Colleges System Office shall provide
ongoing technical support to community colleges participating in the Initiative. FTCC shall enter
into a memorandum of understanding with WCC to jointly co-design the Program. As part of
this effort, the colleges shall engage an organization with demonstrated expertise in designing
and implementing learner-centered, modular, and competency-based high school programs
aligned with emerging and high-tech career pathways. The selected organization shall have a
history of co-designing stackable credentials with local education agencies and postsecondary
institutions and a proven track record of building digital infrastructure that supports
student-paced progression, interdisciplinary instruction, and authentic skill development. The
organization shall assist in the development of a comprehensive framework for the Program,
including course design, sequencing, credentialing structure, and related elements necessary to
support personalized student progression during the 2025-2026 school year.
SECTION 4.(f) It is the intention of the General Assembly to appropriate from the
General Fund to the Community Colleges System Office the sum of up to three million seven
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($3,750,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year
to be allocated to FTCC and WCC for the purposes outlined in this section. To the extent funds
are appropriated for this purpose, the sum of up to two million seven hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($2,750,000) shall be allocated to FTCC and the sum of up to one million dollars
($1,000,000) shall be allocated to WCC. Funds allocated for the purposes outlined in this section
shall not revert but shall remain available until the end of the 2028-2029 fiscal year.

COMPETENCY-BASED EDUCATION AND HIGH SCHOOL REDESIGN
STRATEGIC NETWORK
SECTION 5. MGSD, MCC, Wake Tech, WCPSS, FTCC, WCC, and SparkNC shall
collaborate to create a Competency-Based Education and High School Redesign Strategic
Network (Network). The president of SparkNC, or the president's designee, shall serve as the
chair of the Network. The chair shall coordinate the operations of the Network and provide
administrative and technical support for the Network to the extent such support is necessary. The
Network shall provide a means for each entity to share what it has learned and developed
regarding CBE and high school redesign. The goals of the Network shall be to advance the goals
of developing a CBE approach to education across the State.

OFFICE OF LEARNING RESEARCH EVALUATION
SECTION 6.(a) The Office of Learning Research at the North Carolina
Collaboratory shall study and evaluate the Programs established pursuant to this Part and report
to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by March 15, 2027, and annually
thereafter, culminating in a final report on March 15, 2030. Reports shall include at least the
following:
(1) The total number of students engaging with these programs.
(2) The total amount of funds expended to implement, design, and operate the
programs.
Senate Bill 579-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Effects on student achievement and learning outcomes.
(4) Any other information requested by the Committee.
SECTION 6.(b) It is the intention of the General Assembly to appropriate from the
General Fund to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of up to
four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year to be allocated to the North Carolina Collaboratory for the Office of Learning Research to
conduct the study and evaluation required by this section.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 7. This act becomes effective when the Current Operations
Appropriations Act of 2025 becomes law and if that bill appropriates funds for the purposes
detailed in each section of this act.
Page 8 Senate Bill 579-First Edition